Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.110

Borrowed moneys—Liability.

(1) A local government that has established a health sciences and services authority under RCW 35.104.030 may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the authority to borrow money under the conditions set forth in this section.

(2) Moneys borrowed by an authority must be secured by funds derived from gifts or grants from any source, public or private, federal, state, or local government grants or payments, or intergovernmental transfers.

(3) The authority shall incur no expense or liability that is an obligation, either general or special, of the state or local government, or a general obligation of the authority, and shall pay no expense or liability from funds other than funds of the authority.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 33 s 4.]